Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-225
Veterans preference; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 48-225 to 48-231:

(1) Servicemember means a person who serves in the armed forces of the United States;

(2) Veteran means:

(a) A person who served full-time duty with military pay and allowances in the armed forces of the United States, except for training or for determining physical fitness, and was discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions); or

(b) The spouse of a veteran who (i) has a one hundred percent permanent disability as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or (ii) was killed in the line of duty or died due to his or her military service;

(3) Full-time duty means duty during time of war or during a period recognized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as qualifying for veterans benefits administered by the department and that such duty from January 31, 1955, to February 28, 1961, exceeded one hundred eighty days unless lesser duty was the result of a service-connected or service-aggravated disability;

(4) Disabled veteran means an individual who has served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, has been discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions) therefrom, and has established the present existence of a service-connected disability or is receiving compensation, disability retirement benefits, or pension because of a public statute administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or a military department;

(5) Preference eligible means any veteran as defined in this section or the spouse of a servicemember as defined in this section, except that for a spouse of a servicemember such preference is limited to the time during which the servicemember remains on active status and up to one hundred eighty days after the servicemember's discharge or separation from service; and

(6) Veterans preference means the preference given to preference eligibles pursuant to sections 48-225 to 48-231.

Laws 1969, c. 751, § 1, p. 2826;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 368, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB588, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB639, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB144, § 1.